NO.25 A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0103f1822300

25

A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY

DESCRIPTION
•  A/C compressor magnetic clutch does not engage when the A/C switch is turned on.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Improper refrigerant charge amount
•  Open A/C switch magnetic clutch
•  Open circuit between A/C relay and A/C magnetic clutch
•  Poor ground of A/C magnetic clutch
•  Improper A/C magnetic clutch clearance
•  Refrigerant pressure switch is stuck open
•  A/C relay is stuck open
•  Improper A/C cut-off control
•  Open circuit between A/C switch and PCM through both refrigerant pressure switch and A/C amplifier

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Perform the self-test function using the M-MDS.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
•  Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
•  Poor connection to vehicle body ground
Yes
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
2
Disconnect the A/C compressor connector.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch to the ON position.
Is there correct voltage at the terminal of the A/C compressor magnetic clutch connector?
Specification
More than 10.5 V
Yes
Inspect for ground condition of the magnetic clutch on the A/C compressor.
If ground condition is normal, inspect the magnetic clutch coil for an open circuit.
No
Go to the next step.
3
Disconnect the refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Connect jumper wire between terminals of refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Turn the A/C switch on and set the blower fan at any speed.
Measure the PCM terminal 32 voltage.
Is the voltage below 1.0 V?
Yes
Inspect refrigerant pressure switch operation.
If switch is normal, go to the next step.
No
Inspect the following:
•  A/C switch is stuck open
•  Open circuit between refrigerant pressure switch and PCM terminal 32
•  Open circuit of blower motor fan switch and resistor (if blower motor does not operate)
•  Evaporator temperature sensor and A/C amplifier
4
Inspect the A/C cut-off operation.
Does the A/C cut-off work properly?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to the A/C cut-off system inspection results.
5
Remove the jumper wire from the switch connector.
Reconnect the connector to the refrigerant pressure switch.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch on.
Does the fan operate?
Yes
Inspect for a stuck open A/C relay.
Replace if necessary.
No
Inspect following and repair or replace if necessary:
•  Refrigerant charging amount
•  Seized A/C compressor
6
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, reprogram the PCM if later calibration is available. Retest.